Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB269.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13.8(a)(3) and (h) of the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act, are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 13.8. Drug Overdose Medication.--(a) The department, in carrying out its duties under 28 Pa. Code Ch. 1023 (relating to personnel), shall have the following duties:* * *123456789101112131415161718192021 (3) As follows:(i) In consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, develop or approve training and instructional materials about recognizing opioid-related overdoses, administering an opioid antagonist and promptly seeking medical attention. The training and instruction materials shall be provided free of charge on the Internet.(ii) In consultation with the Department of Drug and Alcohol Programs, develop a poster that contains the following information:(A) The signs of an opioid-related overdose.(B) What to do in the event of an opioid-related overdose.(C) Where to find an opioid antagonist.(D) Where to find additional resources and information, which may include a quick-response code or a link to a publicly accessible Internet website.(iii) Develop a pamphlet with information contained on the poster described in subparagraph (ii).(iv) Update existing materials with information described in subparagraph (ii) to satisfy the requirements for the poster described in subparagraph (ii) and the pamphlet described in subparagraph (iii).(v) Make the poster described in subparagraph (ii) and the pamphlet described in subparagraph (iii) available on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(vi) Provide the poster described in subparagraph (ii) in additional languages upon request by an entity listed under subsection (a.1).(vii) Make the poster described in subparagraph (ii) available on the department's publicly accessible Internet 20250HB0269PN1331 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 website in various sizes should the entity wish to download the poster in a size other than the size provided by the department.(a.1) The following entities shall display the poster described in subsection (a)(3)(ii) in a conspicuous location at their properties , if feasible as determined by each entity in discussion with the department:(1) A Commonwealth agency.(2) A metropolitan transportation authority.(3) A municipality. (4) A LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION.(a.2) The department shall pay for the costs associated with printing and distributing each poster described in subsection (a)(3)(ii).(a.3) An entity listed under subsection (a.1) shall not be required to display the poster described in subsection (a)(3)(ii) if the entity already displays a poster with information described in subsection (a)(3)(ii) and provides the department with a notice of the use of the alternative poster.* * *(h) [As used in this section, the term "opioid antagonist" means a drug or device approved by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid overdose, including naloxone hydrochloride or other similarly acting drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose.] As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Commonwealth agency." An executive agency or independent 20250HB0269PN1331 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency as those terms are defined in 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions)."Conspicuous location." A location open to the public where individuals are likely to see and read the poster described in subsection (a)(3)(ii). The term includes a bathroom, bulletin board, entrance, exit, hallway or lobby."LOCAL TRANSPORTATION ORGANIZATION." AS DEFINED IN 74 PA.C.S. § 1503 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS). "Metropolitan transportation authority." An authority operating under 74 Pa.C.S. Ch. 17 (relating to metropolitan transportation authorities)."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township."Opioid antagonist." A drug or device approved by the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act (52 Stat. 1040, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq.) for emergency reversal of known or suspected opioid overdose, including naloxone hydrochloride or other similarly acting drugs approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for the treatment of an opioid overdose."Property." A building owned by an entity listed under subsection (a.1) that is open for public use, including a publicly accessible facility or a communal area used by employees of the entity. The term includes an airport, bus stop, library, park, school or rail stop. RAIL STOP OR A UNIVERSITY WITHIN THE STATE SYSTEM OF HIGHER EDUCATION UNDER ARTICLE XX-A OF THE ACT OF MARCH 10, 1949 (P.L.30, NO.14), KNOWN AS THE "PUBLIC SCHOOL CODE OF 1949."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0269PN1331 - 4 - <--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728